Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-821
Children and Family Behavioral Health Support Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-821 to 71-827 shall be known and may be cited as the Children and Family Behavioral Health Support Act.

Laws 2009, LB603, § 5.